District of Columbia statutes.
24-466

Eligibility for public assistance.

(a)

When a person has been granted either medical or geriatric parole and applies for public assistance, including medical assistance, the Department shall forward the application for assistance to the Department of Human Services, and advise the Board that an application for assistance has been made.

(b)

The Department of Human Services shall, within 60 days of receipt of a medical or geriatric parolee’s application for assistance, determine the eligibility of the person for general assistance, public assistance, Medicaid, or any other District or federal medical assistance program.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Notwithstanding any other law, when a person is released on medical or geriatric parole and is in need of public assistance, including medical assistance, the Department of Human Services shall be responsible for the administrative costs of the initial and any subsequent eligibility determination and the costs of any public assistance, including medical assistance, following a person’s release on medical or geriatric parole for so long as the person is eligible.

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 7, 40 DCR 792
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 704, 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 24-266.
1981 Ed., § 24-266.
Section 5 of D.C. Law 12-21 deleted “general or” preceding “public” in (a); and repealed (c).
Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 12-21 provided that the act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect.
Section 704 of D.C. Law 12-59 deleted “general or” preceding “public” in (a); and repealed (c).
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5 of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 704 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 704 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.